th: สุขภาพและความงาม > ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลส่วนบุคคล > เครื่องสำอาง > เครื่องมือของเครื่องสำอาง > เครื่องมือแต่งหน้า: เครื่องเหลาดินสอเครื่องสำอาง; ไม้พายและเครื่องมือผสมเครื่องสำอาง; กาวและเทปทำตาสองชั้น; การลอกลายสำหรับคิ้ว; ยางรองที่ดัดขนตา; ที่ดัดขนตา; กระจกส่องหน้า; กระดาษซับมัน; อุปกรณ์ขนตาปลอม; แปรงเมคอัพ; พาเลทผสมเครื่องสำอาง; พัฟแป้ง; ฟองน้ำเครื่องสำอาง; ที่ใส่เครื่องสำอางแบบเติมได้
ru: Красота и здоровье > Личная гигиена и уход за собой > Косметика > Косметические инструменты > Инструменты для макияжа: Точилки для косметических карандашей; Косметические шпатели и инструменты для смешивания; Клей и полоски для коррекции нависшего века; Трафареты для бровей; Сменные накладки для щипцов для завивки ресниц; Щипцы для завивки ресниц; Косметические зеркала; Матирующие салфетки для лица; Аксессуары для накладных ресниц; Кисти для макияжа; Палитры для смешивания макияжа; Пуховки для пудры; Спонжи для макияжа; Пустые палетки для косметики
pt-BR: Saúde e beleza > Cuidados pessoais > Cosméticos > Ferramentas cosméticas > Ferramentas de maquiagem: Apontadores de lápis cosmético; Espátulas e ferramentas de mistura cosmética; Fita e cola para pálpebra dupla; Moldes para sobrancelha; Refis para curvex; Curvex; Espelhos de maquiagem; Mata-borrão facial; Acessórios para cílios postiços; Pincéis de maquiagem; Paletas de mistura de maquiagem; Esponjas para pó de maquiagem; Esponjas de maquiagem; Estojos de maquiagem com refil
sk-SK: Zdravie a krása > Osobná starostlivosť > Kozmetika > Kozmetické nástroje > Nástroje na líčenie: Strúhadlá na kozmetické ceruzky; Kozmetické špachtle a miešacie nástroje; Lepidlo a pásky na modelovanie očných viečok; Šablóny na obočie; Náhradné podložky do kliešťov na mihalnice; Kliešte na mihalnice; Kozmetické zrkadlá; Savý papier na tvár; Príslušenstvo na umelé mihalnice; Štetce na make-up; Miešacie palety na make-up; Púdrové tampóny; Hubky na make-up; Doplniteľné make-up paletky a kazety
nb: Skjønnhet og helse > Personlig pleie > Kosmetikk > Kosmetikkverktøy > Sminkeverktøy: Kosmetiske blyantspisser; Kosmetiske spatler og blandeverktøy; Lim og tape for doble øyelokk; Øyenbrynstensiler; Krøllpåfyll til øyevipper; Øyevippekrøllere; Ansiktsspeil; Blottingpapir for ansikt; Tilbehør til falske øyenvipper; Sminkebørster; Sminke blandepaletter; Pudderputer; Sminkesvamper; Sminkepaletter og -etuier for påfylling
pt-PT: Saúde e beleza > Cuidado pessoal > Cosmética > Equipamento de cosmética > Equipamento de maquilhagem: Afia-lápis cosméticos; Espátulas e ferramentas de mistura cosméticas; Fita adesiva dupla face para pálpebras; Stencils de sobrancelhas; Recargas para modelador de pestanas; Modeladores de pestanas; Espelhos de rosto; Papel de absorção facial; Acessórios para pestanas falsas; Escovas de maquilhagem; Paletas de mistura de maquilhagem; Borlas de pó de maquilhagem; Esponjas de maquilhagem; Estojos e paletes de maquilhagem recarregáveis
pl: Zdrowie i uroda > Higiena osobista > Kosmetyki > Akcesoria kosmetyczne > Akcesoria do makijażu: Temperówki do kredek kosmetycznych; Szpatułki i narzędzia do mieszania kosmetyków; Kleje i taśmy do tworzenia drugiej powieki; Szablony do brwi; Gumki do zalotki; Zalotki; Lusterka kosmetyczne; Bibułki matujące; Akcesoria do sztucznych rzęs; Pędzle do makijażu; Palety do mieszania makijażu; Puszek do pudru; Gąbeczki do makijażu; Wielorazowe palety do makijażu
sv: Skönhet och hälsa > Personlig vård > Kosmetika > Kosmetikverktyg > Makeupverktyg: Kosmetiska pennvässare; Kosmetiska spatlar och blandningsverktyg; Lim och tejp för dubbla ögonlock; Ögonbrynsstenciler; Refill till ögonfransböjare; Ögonfransböjare; Ansiktsspeglar; Oljeabsorberande papper; Tillbehör för lösögonfransar; Makeupborstar; Sminkblandningspaletter; Sminkpudervippor; Makeuptvättsvampar; Påfyllningsbara sminkpaletter och -fodral
zh-TW: 保健與美容 > 個人保養 > 化妝品 > 美妝工具 > 彩妝用具: 化妝筆削筆器; 化妝刮棒及混合工具; 雙眼皮膠水/膠帶; 描眉板; 睫毛夾膠條替換補充品; 睫毛夾; 化妝鏡; 吸油面紙; 假睫毛配件; 美妝刷具; 化妝調色盤; 化妝粉撲; 化妝海綿; 可補充彩妝盤和外盒
fr: Santé et beauté > Hygiène personnelle > Cosmétiques > Accessoires cosmétiques > Accessoires de maquillage: Taille-crayons cosmétiques; Spatules et outils de mélange cosmétiques; Colle et ruban adhésif pour double paupière; Pochoirs à sourcils; Recharges de recourbe-cils; Recourbe-cils; Miroirs de maquillage; Papier matifiant pour le visage; Accessoires pour faux cils; Pinceaux de maquillage; Palettes de mélange pour maquillage; Houppettes à poudre; Éponges de maquillage; Palettes et boîtes de maquillage rechargeables
ko: 건강/미용 > 개인 미용/위생 용품 > 화장품 > 화장 도구 > 메이크업 도구: 화장품 연필깎이; 화장품 스패튤러 및 혼합 도구; 쌍꺼풀 접착제/테이프; 눈썹 가이드; 뷰러 리필; 뷰러; 미용 거울; 얼굴용 기름종이; 인조 속눈썹 부대용품; 메이크업 브러시; 메이크업 믹싱 팔레트; 메이크업 파우더 퍼프; 메이크업 스펀지; 메이크업 리필용 팔레트/케이스
ja: 美容・健康 > 衛生日用品 > コスメ・スキンケア > メイク道具・ネイルケア用品 > メイク道具: 化粧品用ペンシル削り; 化粧品用スパチュラ・混合ツール; ふたえ用アイリッド・アイテープ; 眉用ステンシル; ビューラー用替えゴム; ビューラー; 手鏡; あぶらとり紙; つけまつげ関連用品; メイクブラシ; メイクアップ混合パレット; メイクアップパウダーパフ; メイクスポンジ; 詰替用メイクアップケース・パレット
el: Υγεία & ομορφιά > Προσωπική φροντίδα > Καλλυντικά > Καλλυντικά εργαλεία > Εργαλεία μακιγιάζ: Ξύστρες μολυβιών καλλυντικών; Σπάτουλες και εργαλεία ανάμειξης καλλυντικών; Κόλλα & ταινία για διπλό βλέφαρο; Στένσιλ φρυδιών; Ανταλλακτικά για ψαλίδια βλεφαρίδων; Ψαλίδια βλεφαρίδων; Καθρέφτες προσώπου; Χαρτί απορρόφησης λιπαρότητας προσώπου; Αξεσουάρ για ψεύτικες βλεφαρίδες; Πινέλα μακιγιάζ; Παλέτες ανάμειξης μακιγιάζ; Πούδρες μακιγιάζ; Σφουγγαράκια μακιγιάζ; Ξαναγεμιζόμενες παλέτες & θήκες μακιγιάζ
ro-RO: Sănătate și frumusețe > Îngrijire personală > Cosmetice > Instrumente cosmetice > Instrumente de machiaj: Ascuțitori pentru creioane cosmetice; Spatule și instrumente de amestecare cosmetice; Adeziv și bandă pentru pleoape duble; Șabloane pentru sprâncene; Rezerve pentru ondulator de gene; Ondulatoare de gene; Oglinzi pentru față; Hârtie pentru absorbirea sebumului de pe față; Accesorii pentru gene false; Pensule de machiaj; Palete de amestecare pentru machiaj; Pufuri pentru pudră de machiaj; Bureți de machiaj; Palete și cutii de machiaj reîncărcabile
tr: Sağlık ve Güzellik > Kişisel Bakım > Kozmetik > Kozmetik Aletleri > Makyaj Aletleri: Kozmetik Kalem Açacaklar; Kozmetik Spatulaları ve Karıştırma Araçları; Çift Göz Kapağı Yapıştırıcısı ve Bandı; Kaş Kalemleri; Kirpik Kıvırıcı Refilleri; Kirpik Kıvırıcılar; Yüz Aynaları; Yüz Kurutma Kağıtları; Takma Kirpik Aksesuarları; Makyaj Fırçaları; Makyaj Karıştırma Paletleri; Makyaj Pudra Ponponları; Makyaj Süngerleri; Doldurulabilir Makyaj Paletleri ve Kutuları
hu: Egészség és szépség > Személyes gondoskodás > Kozmetikumok > Kozmetikai eszközök > Sminkeszközök: Kozmetikai ceruzahegyezők; Kozmetikai spatulák és keverőeszközök; Duplaszemhéj-ragasztó és szalag; Szemöldökstencil; Szempillagöndörítő utántöltők; Szempilla-göndörítők; Arctükrök; Arcápoló papír; Műszempilla-kiegészítők; Sminkecsetek; Sminkkeverő paletták; Sminkpúderpamacsok; Sminkszivacsok; Újratölthető sminkpaletták és -tokok
nl: Gezondheid en persoonlijke verzorging > Persoonlijke verzorging > Cosmetica > Cosmetische hulpmiddelen > Make-upproducten: Cosmetische potlood puntenslijpers; Cosmetische spatels en menggereedschap; Lijm en tape voor dubbele oogleden; Wenkbrauwenpotlood; Navullingen voor wimperkrullers; Oogwimperkrullers; Make-upspiegels; Blottingpapier voor gezicht; Accessoires voor valse wimpers; Make-upkwasten; Make-up mengpaletten; Make-up poeder pufjes; Make-upsponsjes; Navulbare make-updozen en -paletten
de: Gesundheit & Schönheit > Körperpflege > Kosmetika > Kosmetik-Zubehör > Make-up Zubehör: Kosmetikstiftspitzer; Kosmetik-Spatel & Mischwerkzeuge; Schlupflid-Kleber & -Klebestreifen; Augenbrauenschablonen; Ersatzkissen für Wimpernzangen; Wimpernformer; Make-up-Spiegel; Pudertücher; Zubehör für künstliche Wimpern; Make-up-Pinsel; Make-up-Mischpaletten; Make-up-Puderquasten; Make-up-Schwämme; Nachfüllbare Make-up-Paletten & -Koffer
bg-BG: Здраве и красота > Лична грижа > Козметика > Козметични инструменти > Инструменти за грим: Острилки за козметичен молив; Козметични шпатули и инструменти за смесване; Лепило и тиксо за двоен клепач; Шаблони за вежди; Резервни гумички за извивачки за мигли; Извивачки за мигли; Огледала за лице; Попивателна хартия за лице; Аксесоари за изкуствени мигли; Четки за грим; Палитри за смесване на грим; Пухчета за нанасяне на пудра; Гъби за грим; Палитри и кутийки за грим за многократно пълнене
sl-SI: Zdravje in lepota > Osebna nega > Kozmetika > Kozmetični pripomočki > Pripomočki za ličenje: Šilčki za kozmetične svinčnike; Kozmetične lopatice in mešalni pripomočki; Lepilo in trakovi za privzdig očesnih vek; Šablone za obrvi; Polnilo za pripomoček za vihanje trepalnic; Pripomočki za vihanje trepalnic; Ogledala za obraz; Vpojni papir za obraz; Dodatki za umetne trepalnice; Čopiči za ličenje; Palete za mešanje ličil; Gobice za puder; Gobice za ličenje; Palete in etuiji za ličila za ponovno polnjenje
hr-HR: Zdravlje i ljepota > Osobna njega > Kozmetika > Kozmetički alati > Alati za šminkanje: Šiljila za kozmetičke olovke; Kozmetičke špatulice i alati; Ljepilo i traka za dvostruke kapke; Šablone za obrve; Punjenje za uvijače za trepavice; Uvijači za trepavice; Ogledala za lice; Papir za upijanje suvišne masnoće; Pribor za umjetne trepavice; Kistovi za šminkanje; Palete za miješanje šminke; Jastučići za puder; Spužvice za šminkanje; Punjive palete i kovčezi šminke
lt-LT: Sveikata ir grožis > Asmeninė priežiūra > Kosmetika > Kosmetikos įrankiai > Makiažo įrankiai: Kosmetinių pieštukų drožtuvai; Kosmetinės mentelės ir maišymo įrankiai; Akių vokų klijai ir juostelės; Antakių trafaretai; Blakstienų rietiklių užpildai; Blakstienų rietikliai; Veido veidrodėliai; Sugeriamasis veido popierius; Dirbtinių blakstienų priedai; Makiažo šepetėliai; Makiažo maišymo paletės; Makiažo pudros pufai; Makiažo kempinės; Pakartotinai užpildomos makiažo paletės ir dėklai
vi: Sức khỏe và sắc đẹp > Sản phẩm chăm sóc cá nhân > Mỹ phẩm > Dụng cụ trang điểm mỹ phẩm > Dụng cụ trang điểm: Gọt chì kẻ mắt; Thìa và dụng cụ trộn mỹ phẩm; Keo và miếng dán kích mí; Khuôn kẻ lông mày; Tấm lót thay thế trong dụng cụ uốn lông mi; Bấm lông mi; Gương tay; Giấy thấm mặt; Phụ kiện mi giả; Cọ trang điểm; Bảng trộn trang điểm; Bông phấn trang điểm; Bọt biển trang điểm; Hộp và tấm pha màu trang điểm
en: Health & Beauty > Personal Care > Cosmetics > Cosmetic Tools > Makeup Tools: Cosmetic Pencil Sharpeners; Cosmetic Spatulas & Mixing Tools; Double Eyelid Glue & Tape; Eyebrow Stencils; Eyelash Curler Refills; Eyelash Curlers; Face Mirrors; Facial Blotting Paper; False Eyelash Accessories; Makeup Brushes; Makeup Mixing Palettes; Makeup Powder Puffs; Makeup Sponges; Refillable Makeup Palettes & Cases
it: Salute e bellezza > Cura della persona > Cosmetici > Utensili cosmetici > Accessori per il trucco: Temperamatite cosmetici; Spatole cosmetiche e strumenti di miscelazione; Colla e nastro per doppia palpebra; Stampi per sopracciglia; Ricariche per arricciaciglia; Curva ciglia; Specchi per il trucco; Foglietti opacizzanti; Accessori per ciglia finte; Pennelli per il trucco; Tavolozze di miscelazione del trucco; Piumini di cipria per il trucco; Spugnette per il trucco; Astucci e custodie ricaricabili per il trucco
fi: Terveys ja kauneus > Henkilökohtainen hygienia > Kosmetiikka > Kosmetiikkatarvikkeet > Meikkaustarvikkeet: Kosmetiikkakynän teroitin; Kosmetiikkalasta ja -sekoitustyökalu; Liimat ja teipit kaksoisluomille; Kulmakarvamuotit; Ripsientaivuttimen vaihtokumit; Ripsientaivutin; Kasvopeilit; Imupaperi kasvoille; Tekoripsien tarvikkeet; Meikkisiveltimet; Meikin sekoituslautanen; Meikkipuuteritupsu; Meikkisienet; Täytettävät meikkipaletit ja -rasiat
cs: Zdraví a krása > Osobní péče > Kosmetika > Kosmetické pomůcky > Pomůcky pro make-up: Ořezávátka na kosmetické tužky; Kosmetické špachtle a míchací nástroje; Lepidla a pásky k prodlužování řas; Šablony na obočí; Náhradní gumičky do kleští na řasy; Natáčky na řasy; Zrcátka na makeup; Obličejový savý papír; Příslušenství k umělým řasám; Štětce na makeup; Palety na míchání make-upu; Pudrové polštářky na make-up; Houbičky na make-up; Plnitelné kosmetické palety a pouzdra
da: Sundhed og skønhed > Personlig pleje > Kosmetik > Kosmetiske redskaber > Makeupredskaber: Kosmetiske blyantspidsere; Kosmetiske spatler og blandingsværktøjer; Lim og tape til øjenlåg; Skabeloner til øjenbryn; Curler-refills til øjenvipper; Øjenvippecurlere; Makeupspejle; Trækpapir til ansigtsbehandling; Tilbehør til kunstige øjenvipper; Makeupbørster; Makeup-blandingspaletter; Makeup-pudderkvaster; Makeupsvampe; Genopfyldelige makeuppaletter og -beholdere
es: Salud y belleza > Cuidado personal > Cosméticos > Objetos cosméticos > Objetos para maquillaje: Sacapuntas de lápices cosméticos; Espátulas cosméticas y herramientas de mezcla; Adhesivos y cola de párpado doble; Plantillas para cejas; Recambios para rizapestañas; Rizador de pestañas; Espejos para maquillaje; Toallitas desmaquilladoras; Accesorios para pestañas postizas; Brochas para maquillaje; Paletas de mezcla de maquillaje; Borlas de polvo de maquillaje; Esponjas para maquillaje; Paletas y estuches de maquillaje rellenables
zh-CN: 保健/美容/卫生/护理 > 个人护理 > 化妆品 > 美容工具 > 化妆工具: 化妆笔削笔器; 美妆刮刀与调配工具; 双眼皮胶/胶带; 画眉卡; 睫毛夹替换垫片; 睫毛夹; 化妆镜; 吸油面纸; 假睫毛配件; 化妆刷; 化妆调色板; 粉扑; 化妆棉; 可补充化妆盘/盒